District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3102

License required.

Repealed.

Oct. 4, 1978, D.C. Law 2-114, § 3, 25 DCR 1985
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(39), 46 DCR 3142
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 28, 47 DCR 3431

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3102.
1973 Ed., § 47-3202.

Prior Codifications